Utah statutes.
78A-6-206.   Juvenile court employees -- Salaries -- State courts personnel system -- Exemptions and discharge.

(1)  All employees except judges and commissioners shall be selected, promoted, and discharged through the state courts personnel system for the juvenile court, under the direction and rules of the Board of Juvenile Court Judges and the Judicial Council.

(2)  An employee under the state courts personnel system may not be discharged except for cause and after a hearing before the appointing authority, with appeal as provided by the state courts personnel system.  An employee may be suspended pending the hearing and appeal.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

